Hawaii statutes.
§431:21-117 Immunity and limitation
on liability. There shall be no liability on the part of and no cause of
action of any nature shall arise against any member insurer, the association or
its agents or employees, the board of directors, the commissioner, or the
commissioner's representatives for any action taken by them in the performance
of their powers and duties under this article. Chapters 661 and 662 or any
other law to the contrary notwithstanding, nothing in this article shall create
an obligation, debt, claim, cause of action, claim for relief, charge, or any
other liability of any kind whatsoever in favor of any person or entity,
without regard to whether that person or entity receives any benefits under
this article, against the State, or its officers and employees. The State and
its officers and employees shall not be liable for the results of any
application, denial of application, claim, loss, or other benefits provided by
the association pursuant to this article. Nothing in this article shall be
construed as authorizing any claim against the State whatsoever, nor shall this
article be construed as authorizing any claim against the association in excess
of any note, loan, liability, or other obligation incurred by the association.
[L 1991, c 284, pt of §2; am L 1992, c 143, §7]

Previous
Vol09_Ch0431-0435H
Next